California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(3) If the respondent was timely provided with all of the services and supports required by the CARE plan, the fact that the respondent failed to successfully complete their CARE plan, including reasons for that failure, shall be a fact considered by the court in a subsequent hearing under the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000)), provided that the hearing occurs within six months of the termination of the CARE plan and shall create a presumption at that hearing that the respondent needs additional intervention beyond the supports and services provided by the CARE plan.

(4) The respondent’s failure to comply with an order shall not result in a penalty outside of this section, including, but not limited to, contempt or a failure to appear. 

(5) The respondent’s failure to comply with a medication order shall not result in any penalty,
 including under this section.

(b) (1) If, at any time during the CARE process, the court finds that the county or other local government entity is not complying with court orders, the court shall report that finding to the presiding judge of the superior court or their designee.

(2) (A) The presiding judge or their designee shall issue an order to show cause why the local government entity should not be fined as set forth in this section. The time set for hearing shall be no earlier than 15 days after the date of the order. The scheduled date of the hearing shall allow adequate time for notice of the hearing to be served upon the local government entity.

(B) The presiding judge, or their designee, shall consider the matter on the record established at the hearing. If the
 presiding judge or their designee finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that the local government entity has substantially failed to comply with this part, or with lawful orders issued by a court under this part, the presiding judge or their designee may issue an order imposing a fine under this section.

(C) A fine under this section shall be in an amount of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day, not to exceed $25,000 for each individual violation identified in the order imposing fines.

(D) (i) Funds collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the CARE Act Accountability Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Upon appropriation, the department shall administer the funds annually, and shall issue guidance, as necessary, to local government entities, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5984, regarding the distribution
 and conditions associated with the administered funds.

(ii) All moneys in the fund shall be allocated and distributed to the local government entity that paid the fines, to be used by that entity to serve individuals who have schizophrenia spectrum or other psychotic disorders and who are experiencing, or are at risk of, homelessness, criminal justice involvement, hospitalization, or conservatorship.

(3) If, after notice and hearing as set forth in paragraph (2), the presiding judge or their designee finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that the local government entity is persistently noncompliant with this part, or with lawful orders issued by a court under this part, the presiding judge or their designee may appoint a special master to secure court-ordered care for the respondent at the local government entity’s cost. The presiding judge, or their designee, shall not make an
 order under this paragraph unless they have received five or more reports under paragraph (1) pertaining to the same local government entity within a one-year period.

(4) In determining the application of the remedies available under this section, the court shall consider whether there are any mitigating circumstances impairing the ability of the local government entity to fully comply with the requirements of this part, or with court orders issued under this part. The court may consider whether the local government entity is making a good faith effort to come into substantial compliance or is facing substantial undue hardships.

(c) Either the respondent or the county behavioral health agency may appeal an adverse court determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 319, Sec. 7.   (SB 1338)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Supporter and Counsel [5980. - 5981.5.]

5980.

(a) Subject to appropriation, the department, in consultation with disability rights groups, county behavioral health and aging agencies, individuals with lived expertise, families, racial justice experts, and other appropriate stakeholders, shall provide optional training and technical resources for volunteer supporters on the CARE process, community services and supports, supported decisionmaking, people with behavioral health conditions, trauma-informed care, family psychoeducation, and psychiatric advance directives. The department may consult with other state and national public and nonprofit agencies and organizations and the Judicial Council to align supported decisionmaking training with best practices for persons with mental illnesses, intellectual and developmental disabilities, other
 disabilities, and older adults. The department may enter into a technical assistance and training agreement for this purpose, pursuant to Section 5984.

(b) The supporter shall do all of the following:

(1) Offer the respondent a flexible and culturally responsive way to maintain autonomy and decisionmaking authority over their own life by developing and maintaining voluntary supports to assist them in understanding, making, communicating, and implementing their own informed choices.

(2) Strengthen the respondent’s capacity to engage in and exercise autonomous decisionmaking and prevent or remove the need to use more restrictive protective mechanisms, such as conservatorship.

(3) Assist the respondent with understanding, making, and communicating
 decisions and expressing preferences throughout the CARE process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 319, Sec. 7.   (SB 1338)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5981.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the respondent may have a supporter present in any meeting, judicial proceeding, status hearing, or communication related to any of the following:

(1) An evaluation.

(2) Development of a CARE agreement or CARE plan.

(3) Establishing a psychiatric advance directive.

(4) Development of a graduation plan.

(b) A supporter is intended to do all the following:

(1) Support the
 will and preferences of the respondent to the best of their ability and to the extent reasonably possible.

(2) Respect the values, beliefs, and preferences of the respondent.

(3) Act honestly, diligently, and in good faith.

(4) Avoid, to the greatest extent possible, and disclose to the court, the respondent, and the respondent’s counsel, minimize, and manage, conflicts of interest. A court may remove a supporter because of any conflict of interest with the respondent, and shall remove the supporter if the conflict cannot be managed in such a way to avoid any possible harm to the respondent.

(c) Unless explicitly authorized by the respondent with capacity to make that authorization, a supporter shall not do either of the following:

(1) Make decisions for, or on behalf of, the respondent, except when necessary to prevent imminent bodily harm or injury.

(2) Sign documents on behalf of the respondent.

(d) In addition to the obligations in this section, a supporter shall be bound by all existing obligations and prohibitions otherwise applicable by law that protect people with disabilities and the elderly from fraud, abuse, neglect, coercion, or mistreatment. This section does not limit a supporter’s civil or criminal liability for prohibited conduct against the respondent, including liability for fraud, abuse, neglect, coercion, or mistreatment, including liability under the Elder Abuse and Dependent Adult Civil Protection Act (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 15600) of Part 3 of Division 9), including, but not limited to, Sections 15656 and
 15657.

(e) The supporter shall not be subpoenaed or called to testify against the respondent in any proceeding relating to this part, and the supporter’s presence at any meeting, proceeding, or communication shall not waive confidentiality or any privilege.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 319, Sec. 7.   (SB 1338)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5981.5.

(a) The Legal Services Trust Fund Commission at the State Bar shall provide funding to qualified legal services projects, as defined in Sections 6213 to 6214.5, inclusive, of the Business and Professions Code, to be used to provide legal counsel appointed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5976, for representation in CARE Act proceedings, matters related to CARE agreements and CARE plans, and to qualified support centers, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6213 of, and Section 6215 of, the Business and Professions Code, for training, support, and coordination.

(b) For purposes of implementing this part, the Legal Services Trust Fund Commission may enter into exclusive or
 nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis, or award grants, provided that they make a finding that both of the following are satisfied:

(1) The Legal Services Trust Fund Commission shall retain control over the distribution of funds to the contractor or grantee.

(2) The contract or grant includes provisions to ensure transparency, accountability, and oversight in delivering the services, including measurement of outcomes established pursuant to Sections 5984, 5985, and 5986.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 283, Sec. 19.   (SB 35)   Effective September 30, 2023.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. CARE Plan [5982. - 5982.]

5982.

(a) The CARE plan may include only the following:

(1) Behavioral health services funded through the 1991 and 2011 Realignment, Medi-Cal behavioral health, health care plans and insurers, and services supported by the Mental Health Services Act pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800).

(2) Medically necessary stabilization medications, to the extent not described in paragraph (1).

(3) Housing resources funded through the No Place Like Home Program (Part 3.9 (commencing with Section 5849.1) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code); California Housing
 Accelerator (Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 50672) of Part 2 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code); the Multifamily Housing Program (Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 50675) of Part 2 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code); the Homeless Housing, Assistance, and Prevention Program (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 50216) of Part 1 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code); the Encampment Resolution Funding Program (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 50250) of Part 1 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code); the Project Roomkey and Rehousing Program pursuant to Provision 22 of Item 5180-151-0001 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Ch. 21, Stats. 2021); the Community Care Expansion Program (Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 18999.97) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code); the CalWORKs Housing Support Program (Article 3.3 (commencing with Section
 11330) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code); the CalWORKs Homeless Assistance pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 11450 of Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code; the Housing and Disability Advocacy Program (Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 18999) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code); the Home Safe Program (Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 15770) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code); the Bringing Families Home Program (Article 6 (commencing with Section 16523) of Chapter 5 of Part 4 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code); the Transitional Housing Placement program for nonminor dependents (Article 4 (commencing with Section 16522) of Chapter 5 of Part 4 of Division 9 of the Welfare and
 Institutions Code); the Transitional Housing Program-Plus pursuant to subdivision (s) of Section 11400 and paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 11403.2 of Article 5 of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and Article 4 (commencing with Section 16522) of Chapter 5 of Part 4 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code; the Behavioral Health Continuum Infrastructure Program (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 5960) of Part 7 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code); the Behavioral Health Bridge Housing Program; HUD-Veterans Affairs Supportive Housing Program (Section 8(o)(19) of the United States Housing Act of 1937 [42 U.S.C. Section 1437f(o)(19)]); Supportive Services for Veteran Families (Section 604 of the Veterans’ Mental Health and Other Care Improvements Act of 2008 [38 U.S.C. Sec. 2044]); HUD Continuum of Care program (Section 103 of
 the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act [42 U.S.C. Sec. 11302]); the Emergency Solutions Grant (Subtitle B of Title IV of the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act [42 U.S.C. Secs. 11371-11378]); HUD Housing Choice Voucher program (Section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 [42 U.S.C. Sec. 1437f]); the Emergency Housing Vouchers (Section 3202 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 [Public Law 117-2]; Section 8(o) of the United States Housing Act of 1937 [42 U.S.C. Sec. 1437f(o)]); HOME Investment Partnerships Program (Title II of the Cranston-Gonzalez National Affordable Housing Act [42 U.S.C. Sec. 12721 et seq.]); the Community Development Block Grant Program (Title 1 of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974 [42 U.S.C. Sec. 5301 et seq.]); housing supported by the Mental Health Services Act pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800); community development
 block grants; and other state and federal housing resources.

(4) Social services funded through Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Payment (SSI/SSP), Cash Assistance Program for Immigrants (CAPI), CalWORKs, California Food Assistance Program, In-Home Supportive Services program, and CalFresh.

(5) Services provided pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 17000) of Division 9.

(6) Upon the consent of the respondent and the entity or individual financially responsible for the services, additional services to support the recovery and stability of the respondent.

(b) Individuals who are CARE process participants shall be prioritized for
 any appropriate bridge housing funded by the Behavioral Health Bridge Housing program.

(c) If the county behavioral health agency elects not to enroll the respondent into a full service partnership, as defined in Section 3620 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations, the court may request information on the reasons for this and any barriers to enrollment.

(d) All CARE plan services and supports ordered by the court are subject to available funding and all applicable federal and state statutes and regulations, contractual provisions, and policy guidance governing initial and ongoing program eligibility. In addition to the resources funded through programs listed in subdivision (a), the State Department of Health Care Services may identify other adjacent covered Medi-Cal
 services, including, but not limited to, enhanced care management and available community supports, which may be suggested, although not ordered, by the court, subject to all applicable federal and state statutes, regulations, contractual provisions, and policy guidance.

(e) This section does not prevent a county or other local governmental entity from recommending their own services that are their own responsibility not listed in subdivision (a) or (c). Any such recommendation is not required by this section and shall be made at the request of the county for the purposes of Section 6 of Article XIIIB, and Sections 6 and 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(f) (1) For respondents who are Medi-Cal beneficiaries, the county
 in which the respondent resides is the county of responsibility as defined in Section 1810.228 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) If a proceeding commences in a county where the respondent is found or is facing criminal or civil proceedings that is different than the county in which the respondent resides, the county in which the respondent is found or is facing criminal or civil proceedings shall not delay proceedings under this part and is the responsible county behavioral health agency for providing or coordinating all components of the CARE agreement or CARE plan.

(3) The county in which the respondent resides, as defined in paragraph (1), shall be responsible for the costs of providing all CARE agreement or CARE plan behavioral health services, as defined
 in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(4) In the event of a dispute over responsibility for any costs of providing components of the CARE agreement or CARE plan, the impacted counties shall resolve the dispute in accordance with the arbitration process established in Section 1850.405 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations for county mental health plans, including for respondents who are not Medi-Cal beneficiaries, and pursuant to any related guidance issued pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5984.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 640, Sec. 10.   (SB 42)   Effective September 27, 2024.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Technical Assistance and Administration [5983. - 5987.]

5983.

(a) The California Health and Human Services Agency, or a designated department within the agency, shall do both of the following:

(1) Engage an independent, research-based entity, as described in Section 5986, to advise on the development of data-driven process and outcome measures to guide the planning, collaboration, reporting, and evaluation of the CARE Act pursuant to this part.

(2) Convene a working group to provide coordination and on-going engagement with, and support collaboration among, relevant state and local partners and other stakeholders throughout the phases of county implementation to support the successful implementation
 of the CARE Act. The working group shall meet no more than quarterly. The working group shall meet during the implementation and shall end no later than December 31, 2026.

(b) The department shall provide training and technical assistance to county behavioral health agencies to support the implementation of this part, including training regarding the CARE process, CARE agreement and plan services and supports, supported decisionmaking, the supporter role, trauma-informed care, elimination of bias, psychiatric advance directives, family psychoeducation, and data collection.

(c) The Judicial Council, in consultation with the department, other relevant state entities, and the County Behavioral Health Directors Association, shall provide training and technical assistance to judicial
 officers to support the implementation of this part, including training regarding the CARE process, CARE agreement and plan services and supports, working with the supporter, supported decisionmaking, the supporter role, the family role, trauma-informed care, elimination of bias, best practices, and evidence-based models of care for people with severe behavioral health conditions.

(d) The department, in consultation with other relevant state departments and the California Interagency Council on Homelessness, shall provide training to counsel regarding the CARE process and CARE agreement and plan services and supports.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 283, Sec. 21.   (SB 35)   Effective September 30, 2023.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5984.

(a) For purposes of implementing this part, the California Health and Human Services Agency and the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this part shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of
 Title 2 of the Government Code, the California Health and Human Services Agency and the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this part, in whole or in part, by means of plan letters, information notices, provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 319, Sec. 7.   (SB 1338)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5985.

(a) (1) The department shall develop, in consultation with county behavioral health agencies, other relevant state or local government entities, disability rights groups, individuals with lived experience, families, counsel, racial justice experts, and other appropriate stakeholders, an annual CARE Act report. The department shall post the annual report on its internet website.

(2) The department, in consultation with county behavioral health agencies and courts, shall specify the length of time that data on former participants shall be reported pursuant to subdivision (e), which shall be a minimum of 12 months after completion of and a maximum of 36 months following
 engagement in CARE Act elective services, a CARE agreement, or CARE plan.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(A) “Former participant” means an individual who enters into CARE Act elective services, a CARE agreement, or a CARE plan, but who has either graduated from CARE, or for whom CARE Act proceedings were dismissed or terminated. Counties shall not be responsible for reporting on any individual who is privately insured or who no longer resides in California.

(B) “Active participants” means an individual who is an elective client, or who has a CARE plan or CARE agreement.

(b) County behavioral health agencies and
 any other state or local governmental entity, as identified by the department, shall provide data related to the CARE Act participants, services, and supports to the department. The department shall determine the data measures and specifications, and shall publish them via guidance issues pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5984.

(c) Each county behavioral health department and any other state and local governmental entity, as identified by the department, shall provide the required data to the department, in a format and frequency as directed by the department.

(d) (1) In consultation with the Judicial Council, the department shall develop an annual reporting schedule for the submission of CARE Act data from the trial courts.

(2) Data from the trial courts shall be submitted to the Judicial Council, which shall aggregate the data and submit it to the department consistent with the reporting schedule developed pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) On an annual basis to be determined by the Judicial Council and consistent with the annual reporting schedule developed pursuant to paragraph (1), the trial courts shall report to the Judicial Council the following data related to CARE Act petitions:

(A) The number of petitions submitted pursuant to Section 5975.

(B) The number of initial appearance hearings on the petition held pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 5977.

(C) The total number of hearings held pursuant to this part.

(D) The total number of CARE plans ordered and CARE agreements approved.

(E) The total number of court petitions dismissed, as reported by the Judicial Council.

(e) The annual report shall include process measures to examine the scope of impact and monitor the performance of CARE Act model implementation. The measures and reporting requirements shall be developed by the department in consultation with county behavioral health agencies. The report shall include trial court petition data pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) and, to the extent administrative data is available, all of the following
 information compiled from county behavioral health departments and courts:

(1) The demographics of all participants, including, but not limited to, the age, sex, race, ethnicity, disability, languages spoken, sexual orientation, gender identity, housing status, veteran status, immigration status, health coverage status, including Medi-Cal enrollment status, information related to CARE criteria outlined in Section 5972, and county of residence.

(2) The petitioner’s relationship to the CARE Act respondent as defined in Section 5974.

(3) The services and supports ordered, the services and supports provided, and the services and supports ordered but not provided to all active and former participants.

(4) The housing placements of all active and former participants. Placements include, but are not limited to, transition to a higher level of care, independent living in the person’s own house or apartment, community-based housing, community-based housing with services, shelter, and no housing.

(5) Treatments continued and terminated of all active and former participants.

(6) Substance use disorder rates and rates of treatment among all active and former participants.

(7) Detentions and other Lanterman-Petris-Short Act involvement for all active and former participants.

(8) Criminal justice
 involvement of all active and former participants.

(9) Deaths among all active and former participants, along with the cause of death.

(10) Type, format, and frequency of outreach and engagement activities provided by a county behavioral health agency to engage an individual who is the subject of a referral or petition, including interactions about the individuals eligible or likely to be eligible and outcomes of these efforts.

(11) In consultation with the department and county behavioral health departments, the number, rates, and trends of contacts made to the county behavioral health agency about individuals eligible or likely to be eligible for the CARE process, including outcomes of those contacts.

(12) The number, rates, and source of referrals to county behavioral health departments, including, but not limited to, referrals resulting in a petition or reason for not filing a petition, length of time from referral to outcome, and services provided for those engaged voluntarily without a petition.

(13) The number, rates, and trends of petitions resulting in dismissal and hearings.

(14) Information on petition dispositions, including, but not limited to, disposition recommendations and the number of days from petition to disposition.

(15) The number, rates, and trends of supporters.

(16) The
 number, rates, and trends of approved CARE agreements.

(17) The number, rates, and trends of ordered and completed CARE plans.

(18) Statistics on the services and supports, including court orders for stabilizing medications.

(19) The rates of adherence to medication.

(20) The number, rates, and trends of psychiatric advance directives created for active participants.

(21) The number, rates, and trends of developed graduation plans.

(22) Outcome measures to assess the effectiveness of the CARE Act model, such as improvement in
 housing status, including gaining and maintaining housing, reductions in emergency department visits and inpatient hospitalizations, reductions in law enforcement encounters and incarceration, reductions in involuntary treatment and conservatorship, and reductions in substance use.

(23) A health equity assessment of the CARE Act to identify demographic disparities based on demographic data in paragraph (1), and to inform disparity reduction efforts.

(24) Data regarding referrals made pursuant to Section 5978.1, as part of the CARE Act.

(f) (1) The report shall include, at a minimum, information on the effectiveness of the CARE Act model in improving outcomes and reducing disparities, homelessness,
 criminal justice involvement, conservatorships, and hospitalization of participants. The annual report shall include process measures to examine the scope of impact and monitor the performance of CARE Act model implementation, such as the number and source of petitions filed for CARE Court; the number, rates, and trends of petitions resulting in dismissal and hearings; the number, rates, and trends of supporters; the number, rates, and trends of voluntary CARE agreements; the number, rates, and trends of ordered and completed CARE plans; the services and supports included in CARE plans, including court orders for stabilizing medications; the rates of adherence to medication; the number, rates, and trends of psychiatric advance directives; and the number, rates, and trends of developed graduation plans. The report shall include outcome measures to assess the effectiveness of the CARE Act model, such
 as improvement in housing status, including gaining and maintaining housing; reductions in emergency department visits and inpatient hospitalizations; reductions in law enforcement encounters and incarceration; reductions in involuntary treatment and conservatorship; and reductions in substance use. The annual report shall examine these data through the lens of health equity to identify racial, ethnic, and other demographic disparities and inform disparity reduction efforts.

(2) Data shall be stratified by age, sex, race, ethnicity, languages spoken, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, housing status, veteran status, immigration status, health coverage source, and county, to the extent statistically relevant data is available.

(g) The outcomes shall be presented to
 relevant state oversight bodies, including, but not limited to, the California Interagency Council on Homelessness.

(h) (1) Beginning in 2026, the department shall include in its annual CARE Act report quantitative, deidentified information concerning the operation of this part.

(2) Based on information provided to the department in a form and manner specified by the department, in consultation with the Judicial Council and county behavioral health departments, in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 5984, the report shall include all of the following information, aggregated by county, compiled from county behavioral health departments, courts, and the department, depending on the source:

(A) The number of contacts to the county behavioral health department about individuals eligible or likely to be eligible for the CARE process, including outcome of contacts.

(B) The number of CARE petitions filed with the superior court.

(C) The petitioner type for each petition filed with the superior court.

(D) Disposition of each petition filed with the superior court.

(E) The number of days between filing each petition and the petition’s disposition.

(F) Demographic information of each CARE Act participant or potentially eligible CARE Act participant, including, but not limited to,
 age, sex, race, ethnicity, disability, languages spoken, sexual orientation, gender identity, housing status, veteran status, immigration status, health coverage status, including Medi-Cal enrollment status, information related to CARE criteria outlined in Section 5972, and county of residence, to the extent administrative data is available and statistically relevant.

(G) The number of referrals of individuals in conservatorship proceedings made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5978, including the disposition of each referral.

(H) The number of referrals made pursuant to Section 5978.1, including the disposition of each referral.

(i) Information publicly released or published pursuant to this part shall not contain data
 that may lead to the identification of participants or petitioners or information that would otherwise allow an individual to link the published information to a specific person. Data published by the department shall be deidentified in compliance with Section 164.514(a) and (b) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 528, Sec. 9.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5986.

(a) An independent, research-based entity shall be retained by the department to develop, in consultation with county behavioral health agencies, county CARE courts, racial justice experts, and other appropriate stakeholders, including providers and CARE court participants, an independent evaluation of the effectiveness of the CARE Act. The independent evaluation shall employ statistical research methodology and include a logic model, hypotheses, comparative or quasi-experimental analyses, and conclusions regarding the extent to which the CARE Act model is associated, correlated, and causally related with the performance of the outcome measures included in the annual reports. The independent evaluation shall include results from a survey conducted
 of program participants. The independent evaluation shall highlight racial, ethnic, and other demographic disparities, and include causal inference or descriptive analyses regarding the impact of the CARE Act on disparity reduction efforts.

(b) The department shall provide a preliminary report to the Legislature by December 31, 2026, and a final report to the Legislature by December 31, 2028. The department shall post the preliminary and final reports on its internet website.

(c) Each county behavioral health department, each county CARE court, and any other state or local governmental entity, as determined by the department, shall provide the required data to the department, in a format and frequency as directed by the department.

(d) A report to be submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 283, Sec. 22.   (SB 35)   Effective September 30, 2023.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5987.

A county, or an employee or agent of a county, shall not be held civilly or criminally liable for any action by a respondent in the CARE process, except when the act or omission of a county, or the employee or agent of a county, constitutes gross negligence, recklessness, or willful misconduct. This section does not limit any immunity provided under any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 319, Sec. 7.   (SB 1338)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 6. ADMISSIONS AND JUDICIAL COMMITMENTS [6000. - 6825.]



PART 1. ADMISSIONS [6000. - 6008.]



  CHAPTER 1. Voluntary Admissions to Mental Hospitals and Institutions [6000. - 6008.]

6000.

(a) Pursuant to applicable rules and regulations established by the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services, the medical director of a state hospital may receive in that hospital, as a boarder and patient, a person who is a suitable person for care and treatment in that hospital, upon receipt of a written application for the admission of the person into the hospital for care and treatment made in accordance with the following requirements:

(1) In the case of an adult, the application shall be made voluntarily by the person, at a time when he or she is in a condition of mind as to render him or her competent to make it or, if he or she is a conservatee with a conservator of the person or person and estate who was appointed
 under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5 with the right as specified by court order under Section 5358 to place his or her conservatee in a state hospital, by his or her conservator.

(2) In the case of a minor, the application shall be made by his or her parents, or by the parent, guardian, conservator, or other person entitled to his or her custody to a mental hospital as may be designated by the Director of State Hospitals or the Director of Developmental Services to admit minors on voluntary applications. If the minor has a conservator of the person, or the person and the estate, appointed under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5, with the right as specified by court order under Section 5358 to place the conservatee in a state hospital the application for the minor shall be made by his or her conservator.

(b) A person
 received in a state hospital shall be deemed a voluntary patient.

(c) Upon the admission of a voluntary patient to a state hospital the medical director shall immediately forward to the office of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services the record of the voluntary patient, showing the name, residence, age, sex, place of birth, occupation, civil condition, date of admission of the patient to the hospital, and other information as required by the rules and regulations of the department.

(d) The charges for the care and keeping of a person with a mental health disorder in a state hospital shall be governed by the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 7275) of Chapter 3 of Division 7 relating to the charges for the care and keeping of persons with mental health disorders in state hospitals.

(e) A voluntary adult patient may leave the hospital or institution at any time by giving notice of his or her desire to leave to a member of the hospital staff and completing normal hospitalization departure procedures. A conservatee may leave in a like manner if notice is given by his or her conservator.

(f) A minor who is a voluntary patient may leave the hospital or institution after completing normal hospitalization departure procedures after notice is given to the superintendent or person in charge by the parents, or the parent, guardian, conservator, or other person entitled to the custody of the minor, of their desire to remove him or her from the hospital.

(g) No person received into a state hospital, private mental institution, or county psychiatric hospital as a voluntary patient during his or her minority
 shall be detained therein after he or she reaches the age of majority. A person, after attaining the age of majority, may apply for admission into the hospital or institution for care and treatment in the manner prescribed in this section for applications by an adult.

(h) The State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services shall establish rules and regulations necessary to carry out properly the provisions of this section.
